Ohio, session 136, HB95.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF OHIO:
Section 1. All items in this act are hereby appropriated 4
as designated out of any moneys in the state treasury to the 5
credit of the designated fund. For all operating appropriations 6
made in this act, those in the first column are for fiscal year 7
2026 and those in the second column are for fiscal year 2027. 8
The operating appropriations made in this act are in addition to 9
any other operating appropriations made for these fiscal years. 10
Section 2. 11
12
1 2 3 4 5
A BOR DEPARTMENT OF HIGHER EDUCATION
B General Revenue Fund
C GRF 235450 Military and Veterans Offices $1,144,000 $1,144,000

H. B. No. 95 Page 2
As Re-Referred by the House Rules and Reference Committee
D TOTAL GRF General Revenue Fund $1,144,000 $1,144,000
E TOTAL ALL BUDGET FUND GROUPS $1,144,000 $1,144,000
MILITARY AND VETERANS OFFICES 13
(A) The foregoing appropriation item 235450, Military and 14
Veterans Offices, shall be used by the Chancellor of Higher 15
Education to support higher education institutions that are 16
members of the Ohio Veterans Education Council. The Chancellor 17
may consult with the Director of Veterans Services as needed. 18
(B) Of the foregoing appropriation item 235450, Military 19
and Veterans Offices, up to $213,750 in each fiscal year shall 20
be used by the Chancellor to provide awards of $2,500 per 21
student to up to six students serving as a Military Community 22
Advocate at an Ohio Veterans Education Council-member public 23
university and up to three students serving as a Military 24
Community Advocate at an Ohio Veterans Education Council-member 25
public community college or private nonprofit university or 26
college. 27
(C) Of the foregoing appropriation item 235450, Military 28
and Veterans Offices, $255,000 in each fiscal year shall be used 29
for grants for military and veterans offices at institutions of 30
higher education to support growth in private philanthropy, in 31
collaboration with the National Veterans Leadership Foundation. 32
(D) Of the foregoing appropriation item 235450, Military 33
and Veterans Offices, $91,800 in each fiscal year shall be used 34
to sponsor staff from military and veterans offices at 35
institutions of higher education to attend the National Veterans 36
Leadership Foundation's Advancement Institute. 37
(E) The remainder of the foregoing appropriation item 38

H. B. No. 95 Page 3
As Re-Referred by the House Rules and Reference Committee
235450, Military and Veterans Offices, shall be used to do all 39
of the following: 40
(1) Support the administrative costs of the National 41
Veterans Leadership Foundation; 42
(2) Create a web site to connect veterans to programs and 43
offerings at all Ohio Veterans Education Council-member colleges 44
and universities; 45
(3) Administer membership and Ohio Purple Star status; 46
(4) Facilitate information sharing; 47
(5) Support any other expenses as determined appropriate 48
by the Chancellor, in consultation with the National Veterans 49
Leadership Foundation. 50
Section 3. Within the limits set forth in this act, the 51
Director of Budget and Management shall establish accounts 52
indicating the source and amount of funds for each appropriation 53
made in this act, and shall determine the manner in which 54
appropriation accounts shall be maintained. Expenditures from 55
operating appropriations contained in this act shall be 56
accounted for as though made in, and are subject to all 57
applicable provisions of, the main operating appropriations act 58
of the 136th General Assembly. 59